North Carolina, session 2025, SB989.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. CREATE HUMAN TRAFFICKING RECORDS COMMISSION TO REVIEW
AND RELEASE RECORDS
SECTION 1. Chapter 114 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 11.
"Human Trafficking Records Commission.
"§ 114-80. Commission established; duties.
(a) There is established within the Department of Justice the Human Trafficking Records
Commission (Commission). The Commission shall review and release records related to the
investigation of Jeffrey Epstein that are held by State authorities. The Commission shall redact
all personally identifiable information of victims referenced in the records.
(b) To the extent a member or officer of the General Assembly is identified in the records
described in subsection (a) of this section, the common law of legislative privilege and the
common law of legislative immunity do not apply in matters related to the investigation of Jeffrey
Epstein."

PART II. MAKE CONFORMING CHANGES TO LEGISLATIVE PRIVILEGE AND
CONFIDENTIALITY
SECTION 2.1. G.S. 120-137 reads as rewritten:
"§ 120-137. Legislative privilege.
Nothing in this Chapter nor in Chapter 132 of the General Statutes shall be construed as a
waiver of the common law of legislative privilege or legislative immunity by a legislator or
former legislator. A legislator or former legislator may assert the common law of legislative
privilege or the common law of legislative immunity in all instances.instances, subject to
G.S. 114-80."
SECTION 2.2. G.S. 132-1.4 reads as rewritten:
*S989-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 132-1.4. Criminal investigations; intelligence information records; Innocence Inquiry
Commission records.
(a) Records of criminal investigations conducted by public law enforcement agencies,
records of criminal intelligence information compiled by public law enforcement agencies, and
records of investigations conducted by the North Carolina Innocence Inquiry Commission, are
not public records as defined by G.S. 132-1. Records of criminal investigations conducted by
public law enforcement agencies or records of criminal intelligence information may be released
by order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
…
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, and unless otherwise prohibited by
law, the following information shall be public records within the meaning of G.S. 132-1:
…
(7) The contents of records released by the Human Trafficking Records
Commission as described in G.S. 114-80.
…."

PART III. AUTHORIZE STATE BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION TO ASSIST HUMAN
TRAFFICKING RECORDS COMMISSION
SECTION 3. G.S. 143B-1208.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-1208.5. Investigations of lynchings, election frauds, etc.; services subject to call of
Governor; Governor or Attorney General; witness fees and mileage for
employees.
…
(f1) The State Bureau of Investigation is further authorized, upon request by the Attorney
General, to assist the Human Trafficking Records Commission with investigations related to
individuals identified in the records described in G.S. 114-80.
…."

PART IV. ALLOW ISSUANCE OF EXTREME RISK PROTECTION ORDERS
SECTION 4.1. Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 54C.
"Extreme Risk Protection Orders.
"§ 14-415.28. Definitions; purpose.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Commission. – The North Carolina Human Trafficking Records Commission.
(2) Extreme Risk Protection Order or ERPO. – An order granted under this
Article.
(3) Firearm. – As defined in G.S. 14-409.39(2).
(4) Records. – Documents related to the investigation of Jeffrey Epstein as
described in G.S. 114-80.
(b) Purpose. – The purpose of this section is to restrict access to and remove firearms
from certain individuals identified in the records released by the Commission.
"§ 14-415.29. Issuance of ERPOs related to records released by the Commission.
(a) Authorization. – District court judges in this State are authorized to issue ERPOs for
certain individuals identified in the records released by the Commission.
(b) Contextual Findings Required. – A district court judge shall review the context within
which an individual was identified in the released records before issuing any ERPO under this
section.
(c) Hearing Required. – Upon issuance of an ERPO to an individual pursuant to this
Article, the issuing court shall require the individual to appear before the court. The court, at the
Page 2 Senate Bill 989-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
hearing, shall inform the individual of the impact of the ERPO on the individual's right to access
firearms. The court shall require the individual to identify the presence of, ownership of, or other
access to firearms by the individual, as well as permits to purchase firearms or carry concealed
firearms.
(d) Required Surrender of Firearms. – After the hearing described in subsection (c) of
this section, the court shall order the individual to immediately surrender to the sheriff all firearms
and permits to purchase firearms or carry concealed firearms that are in the care, custody,
possession, ownership, or control of the individual. The sheriff shall store the firearms or contract
with a licensed firearms dealer to provide storage."
SECTION 4.2. G.S. 14-269.8 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-269.8. Purchase or possession of firearms by person subject to domestic violence
order or Extreme Risk Protection Order prohibited.
(a) In accordance with G.S. 50B-3.1, G.S. 50B-3.1 and G.S. 14-415.29, it is unlawful for
any person to possess, purchase, or receive or attempt to possess, purchase, or receive a firearm,
as defined in G.S. 14-409.39(2), machine gun, ammunition, or permits to purchase or carry
concealed firearms if ordered by the court for so long as that protective order or any successive
protective order entered against that person pursuant to Chapter 50B or Article 54C of Chapter
14 of the General Statutes is in effect.
(b) Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class H felony."

PART V. PROVIDE FUNDING TO DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE
SECTION 5.1. There is appropriated from the Opportunity Scholarship Program to
the Department of Justice the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to establish and operate the Human Trafficking Records
Commission established by this act.
SECTION 5.2. There is appropriated from the Opportunity Scholarship Program to
the Department of Public Safety the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to support investigative activities conducted by
the State Bureau of Investigation under the requirements of this act.

PART VI. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 989-First Edition Page 3